Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
ARTICLE 8
CHILDREN'S BASIC HEALTH PLAN

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2006 containing provisions of some sections formerly located in article 19 of title 26. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

25.5-8-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Children's Basic Health Plan Act".

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1973, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-19-101 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-8-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that a significant percentage of children are uninsured. This lack of health insurance coverage decreases children's access to preventive health-care services, compromises the productivity of the state's future workforce, and results in avoidable expenditures for emergency and remedial health care. Health-care providers, health-care facilities, and all purchasers of health care, including the state, bear the costs of this uncompensated care.

The general assembly further finds and declares that the coordination and consolidation of funding sources currently available to provide services to uninsured children such as the Colorado indigent care program pursuant to part 1 of article 3 of this title, the children's basic health plan, and other children's health programs would efficiently and effectively meet the health-care needs of uninsured children and would help to reduce the volume of uncompensated care in the state.

It is the intent of the general assembly to make health insurance coverage available and affordable and to support employers in their efforts to provide their employees and their dependents with health insurance coverage and to support increased availability of affordable health insurance in the individual market.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the savings and efficiencies realized through actual reductions in administrative and programmatic costs associated with the implementation of this article and achieved in consolidating other health-care programs should be identified.

It is not the intent of the general assembly to create an entitlement for health insurance coverage.

The general assembly hereby declares that the following principles shall be used in implementing the children's basic health plan set forth in this article:

The department shall establish and maintain a goal of inter-program communication in order to maximize existing state appropriations for the population served in the program;

There shall be efficient program utilization through inter-program coordination and program consolidation and, where appropriate, through contracting with the private sector and with essential community providers;

The policies enacted in House Bill 97-1304 regarding a strong managed care direction shall be emphasized;

The private sector shall be involved to the greatest possible degree with respect to contracting for managed care;

There shall be maximum emphasis on coordination with local and state public health programs and initiatives for children.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares:

That the goal of the "Children's Basic Health Plan Act" is to support low-income, working parents and families in overcoming barriers in obtaining good quality, affordable health-care services for their children;

That the health services that low-income children receive through the children's basic health plan should be cost-effective, of high quality, and promote positive health outcomes for enrolled children;

That the children's basic health plan was designed as, and should continue to be, a private-public partnership that encourages enrollment and seeks every opportunity to operate with the efficiency and creativity that is found in utilizing private sector systems and business practices while maintaining the highest level of accountability to the general assembly, the executive branch, and the public through administration of the plan by the department;

That the children's basic health plan was designed as, and should continue to be, a community-based program that encourages local participation in enrolling children in and supporting its goals.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1973, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-19-102 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-8-103. Definitions - rules.

As used in this article 8, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Child" means a person who is less than nineteen years of age.

"Children's basic health plan" or "plan" means the subsidized health insurance product designed by the department of health care policy and financing and provided to enrollees, as defined in this section.

"Department" means the department of health care policy and financing created in section 25.5-1-104.

"Eligible person" means:

A person who is less than nineteen years of age, who is a citizen or meets the immigration status requirements set forth in section 25.5-8-109 (6) or 25.5-8-109 (7), whose family income does not exceed two hundred sixty percent of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family size, and who is not eligible for medical assistance pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4)(a)(I) of this section, if the money in the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee cash fund established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4 (5), together with the corresponding federal matching funds, is insufficient to fully fund all of the purposes described in section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(b), after receiving recommendations from the Colorado healthcare affordability and sustainability enterprise established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4 (3), for persons less than nineteen years of age, the state board may by rule adopted pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-4-402.4 (6)(b)(III) reduce the percentage of the federal poverty line to below two hundred sixty percent, but the percentage shall not be reduced to below two hundred thirteen percent.

Repealed.

A pregnant person who is a citizen or meets the immigration status requirements set forth in section 25.5-8-109 (6) or 25.5-8-109 (7), whose family income does not exceed two hundred sixty percent of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family size, and who is not eligible for medical assistance pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4)(b)(I) of this section, if the money in the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee cash fund established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4 (5), together with the corresponding federal matching funds, is insufficient to fully fund all of the purposes described in section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(b), after receiving recommendations from the Colorado healthcare affordability and sustainability enterprise established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4 (3), for pregnant women, the state board by rule adopted pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-4-402.4 (6)(b)(III) may reduce the percentage of the federal poverty line to below two hundred sixty percent, but the percentage shall not be reduced to below two hundred thirteen percent.

Repealed.

"Enrollee" means any eligible person that has enrolled in the plan.

"Essential community provider" means a health-care provider that:

Has historically served medically needy or medically indigent patients and demonstrates a commitment to serve low-income and medically indigent populations who make up a significant portion of its patient population, or in the case of a sole community provider, serves the medically indigent patients within its medical capability; and

Waives charges or charges for services on a sliding scale based on income and does not restrict access or services because of a client's financial limitations.

"Health-care program" means any health-care program in the state that is supported with state general fund or federal dollars.

"Master settlement agreement" means the master settlement agreement, the smokeless tobacco master settlement agreement, and the consent decree approved and entered by the court in the case denominated State of Colorado, ex rel. Gale A. Norton, Attorney General v. R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Co.; American Tobacco Co., Inc.; Brown & Williamson Tobacco Corp.; Liggett & Myers, Inc.; Lorillard Tobacco Co., Inc.; Philip Morris, Inc.; United States Tobacco Co.; B.A.T. Industries, P.L.C.; The Council For Tobacco Research--U.S.A., Inc.; and Tobacco Institute, Inc., Case No. 97 CV 3432, in the district court for the city and county of Denver.

"Medical services board" means the medical services board created in section 25.5-1-301.

"Subsidized enrollee" means an eligible person who receives a subsidy from the department to purchase coverage under the plan or a comparable health insurance.

"Subsidy" means the amount paid by the department to assist an eligible person in purchasing coverage under the plan or a comparable health insurance product available to the eligible person through another coverage entity.

"Trust" means the children's basic health plan trust created in section 25.5-8-105.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1975, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4) amended, p. 149, § 10, effective March 22.

L. 2008:

(4)(a) amended, p. 2019, § 1, effective March 1, 2009; (4)(b) amended, p. 2019, § 2, effective October 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(4)(a) and (4)(b) amended, (SB 09-211), ch. 2, pp. 3, 4, § § 1, 2, 3, effective February 26; (4) amended, (HB 09-1293), ch. 152, p. 650, § 8, effective July 1; (4)(b) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1985, § 130, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(II), (4)(a)(III)(A), (4)(a)(III)(B), (4)(b)(I), (4)(b)(II), (4)(b)(III)(A), and (4)(b)(III)(B) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2114, § 150, effective August 11.

L. 2017:

IP, (4)(a)(II), and (4)(b)(II) amended, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1466, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(II), (4)(b)(I), and (4)(b)(II) amended, (SB 22-052), ch. 43, p. 217, § 4, effective March 24; (4)(a)(I) and (4)(b)(I) amended, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2844, § 20, effective June 7.

25.5-8-104. Children's basic health plan - rules.

The medical services board is authorized to adopt rules to implement the children's basic health plan to provide health insurance coverage to eligible persons on a statewide basis pursuant to the provisions of this article. Any rules adopted by the children's basic health plan policy board in accordance with the requirements of the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., shall be enforceable and shall be valid until amended or repealed by the medical services board.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1976, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-19-104 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-8-105. Trust - created.

A fund to be known as the children's basic health plan trust is hereby created and established in the state treasury. Except as provided for in subsection (8) of this section, all moneys deposited in the trust and all interest earned on moneys in the trust shall remain in the trust for the purposes set forth in this article, and no part thereof shall be expended or appropriated for any other purpose. The principal of the trust shall be expended, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, solely for the purposes set forth in this article.

Except as provided for in subsection (8) of this section, all or a portion of the moneys in the trust shall be annually appropriated by the general assembly for the purposes of this article and shall not be transferred to or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), moneys in the trust may be used to pay the state's portion of any computer system changes necessary to expand eligibility in the plan.

Pursuant to section 24-75-1104.5 (1.7)(b), C.R.S., and except as otherwise provided in section 24-75-1104.5 (5), C.R.S., beginning in the 2016-17 fiscal year and in each fiscal year thereafter so long as the state receives moneys pursuant to the master settlement agreement, the state treasurer shall transfer to the trust eighteen percent of the total amount of the moneys annually received by the state pursuant to the master settlement agreement, not including attorney fees and costs, during the preceding fiscal year. The state treasurer shall transfer the amount specified in this subsection (3) from moneys credited to the tobacco litigation settlement cash fund created in section 24-22-115, C.R.S. The amount transferred pursuant to this subsection (3) is in addition to and not in replacement of any general fund moneys appropriated to the trust.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Beginning in fiscal year 1998, appropriations to the trust may be made by the general assembly based on the savings achieved through reforms, consolidations, and streamlining of health-care programs realized through actual reductions in administrative and programmatic costs associated with the implementation of this article and not decreases in the number of caseloads of such programs. Beginning with and subsequent to fiscal year 2000-01, the general assembly may make annual appropriations to the trust.

Repealed.

As part of its annual savings report to the general assembly on November 1 of each year, the department may identify efficiencies and consolidations that produce savings in the department's annual budget request that result in actual reductions in administrative and programmatic costs associated with the implementation of this article and not decreases in the number of caseloads of such programs.

The department may receive payment for coverage offered and may receive or contract for donations, gifts, and grants from any source. Such funds shall be transmitted to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the trust. The department may expend such funds from the trust for the purposes of this article.

Beginning in the 2011-2012 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, moneys in the trust may be used for costs associated with children enrolled in the medical assistance program, articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title, whose family income is more than one hundred percent but does not exceed one hundred thirty-three percent of the federal poverty line and who would have been eligible for enrollment in the children's basic health plan prior to September 1, 2011.

On July 1, 2016, the state treasurer shall transfer twenty million dollars from the children's basic health plan trust to the primary care provider sustainability fund created in section 25.5-5-418.

Source:

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 1040, § 10, effective May 25; entire article added with relocations, p. 1976, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 150, § 11, effective March 22; (3)(b) amended, p. 892, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 2020, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2009:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 09-210), ch. 124, p. 531, § 5, effective April 16; (3) amended, (SB 09-269), ch. 333, p. 1768, § 9, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

(1) and (2)(a) amended and (8) added, (SB 11-008), ch. 100, p. 293, § 3, effective September 1.

L. 2012:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 12-1247), ch. 53, p. 197, § 7, effective March 22.

L. 2015:

(1) and (2)(a) amended and (4), (5)(b), and (5)(c) repealed, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 962, § 79, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(3)(a) and (8) amended and (3)(b) repealed, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, pp. 469, 472, § § 20, 26, effective July 1; (6) amended, (HB 16-1081), ch. 22, p. 53, § 10, effective August 10.

25.5-8-106. Annual savings report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1977, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section repealed, (HB 16-1081), ch. 22, p. 52, § 8, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 26-19-106 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-8-107. Duties of the department - schedule of services - premiums - copayments - subsidies - purchase of childhood immunizations.

In addition to any other duties pursuant to this article 8, the department has the following duties:

To design, and from time to time revise, a schedule of health-care services included in the plan and to propose said schedule to the medical services board for approval or modification. The schedule of health-care services as proposed by the department and approved by the medical services board shall include, but shall not be limited to, preventive care, physician services, prenatal care and postpartum care, inpatient and outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and other services that may be medically necessary for the health of enrollees; except that the department may modify the schedule of health-care services to meet specific federal requirements or to accommodate those changes necessary for a program designed specifically for children.

In addition to the items specified in subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section and any additional items approved by the medical services board, on and after January 1, 2001, the medical services board shall include dental services for all enrolled children, and on and after October 1, 2019, for all enrolled pregnant women, in the schedule of health-care services.

In addition to the items specified in subparagraphs (I) and (II) of this paragraph (a) and any additional items approved by the medical services board, the medical services board shall include mental health services that are at least as comprehensive as the mental health services provided to medicaid recipients in the schedule of health-care services.

The schedule of health-care services included in the plan shall not include coverage pursuant to the mandatory coverage provisions of section 10-16-104 (1.4), C.R.S.

In addition to the items specified in subsections (1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), and (1)(a)(III) of this section, and any additional items approved by the medical services board, the medical services board shall include, for all perinatal people, comprehensive lactation support services, lactation supplies and equipment, and maintenance of multi-user loaned equipment. An individual trained in advanced lactation support shall provide the lactation support services. Lactation equipment must include a single-user double electric breast pump, pump parts and pump collection kit, and access to a loaned multi-user hospital grade electric breast pump along with a compatible individual collection kit. Individuals must have access to single-user lactation supplies and equipment prior to delivery. Access to multi-user loaned breast pumps shall be authorized by a health-care provider. Access to multi-user loaned breast pumps is prioritized for individuals with premature, medically fragile, low birth weight infants, and with lactation complications. Individuals cannot be required to enroll in separate or additional programs in order to receive covered lactation equipment or lactation support services.

Repealed.

To design and implement a structure of copayments due to providers of managed health-care plans from enrollees. Enrollees in the plan may use funds from a medical savings account to pay copayments.

To design and propose to the medical services board for adoption detailed rules of eligibility and enrollment processes for the plan;

To design a procedure whereby a financial sponsor may pay the annual enrollment fee or some portion thereof on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee; except that the payment made on behalf of said enrollee shall not exceed the total enrollment fee due from the enrollee;

To design a procedure whereby the plan may pay subsidies for eligible persons to purchase coverage under the plan or a comparable health insurance product;

To establish criteria to allow a managed care plan, the department, or some other entity to verify eligibility pursuant to section 25.5-8-109;

To conduct pilot projects including, but not limited to, testing models of marketing, enrollment, eligibility determination, and premium structures, to be implemented where appropriate and as approved by the joint budget committee.

The department shall develop and implement an outreach strategy for Coloradans who become eligible for health coverage pursuant to section 25.5-2-104, 25.5-2-105, 25.5-5-201 (6), or 25.5-8-109 (7). The state department shall work with stakeholders to develop an outreach strategy that includes:

Funding for community-based organizations to partner with the department on outreach;

A method for providing information related to eligibility and enrollment that can be provided to nonprofit partners, school districts, and charter schools for outreach purposes; and

At a minimum, providing information related to eligibility and coverage in English, Spanish, and in each language spoken by at least two-and-one-half percent of the population of any county who speak English less than very well, as defined by the United States bureau of the census American community survey, and who speak the minority language at home;

Approximately twelve and twenty-four months after implementation of the strategy required pursuant to subsection (1)(i)(I) of this section, the department shall convene stakeholders, including directly impacted individuals, service providers, and advocacy organizations that are diverse with regard to race, ethnicity, immigration status, sexual orientation, and gender identity and who are affected by higher rates of health disparities and inequities. The department shall report on the outreach and enrollment strategy outcomes, including enrollment of eligible persons into these programs compared to those persons who are eligible for coverage, but not enrolled.

The department is authorized to institute a program for competitive bidding pursuant to section 24-103-202 or 24-103-203, C.R.S., for providing medical services on a managed care basis for children under this article. The department shall select more than one managed care contractor to serve counties in which there are providers contracting with more than one managed care plan. In counties where there is only one operational managed care plan, the department may contract with that managed care plan to serve children enrolled in the plan. The department shall assure the utilization of essential community providers for the provision of services including eligibility determination, enrollment, and outreach when reasonable. The department shall contract with managed care organizations for the delivery of health services pursuant to this article. The department may contract with essential community providers for health-care services in areas of the state that are not adequately served by managed care organizations.

The department may contract for billing and premium collection functions for the children's basic health plan with vendors who provide billing and premium collection functions for other state insurance programs in order to consolidate billing and premium collection functions among multiple state programs. Such contracts may be entered into if the department determines that the scope of work provided by the vendor is similar to the work requirements for the children's basic health plan and that it would be more efficient and cost-effective to contract with the same vendor on multiple programs.

Commencing with fiscal year 2001-02, the annual administrative costs for the children's basic health plan shall not exceed ten percent of the total annual program costs.

The department may purchase vaccines recommended by the advisory committee on immunization practices to the centers for disease control and prevention in the federal department of health and human services, or its successor entity, through a vaccine purchasing system, if such a system is developed pursuant to section 25-4-2403 (1), C.R.S., for children enrolled in the children's basic health plan.

Source:

L. 2006:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1505, § 51, effective June 1; entire article added with relocations, p. 1978, § 7, effective July 1; (1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1078, § 6, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2008:

(2)(a)(III) added, p. 2020, § 4, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(1)(a)(IV) added, (SB 09-244), ch. 391, p. 2118, § 5, effective July 1, 2010.

L. 2010:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2115, § 151, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (HB 13-1266), ch. 217, p. 993, § 64, effective May 13; (5) amended, (SB 13-222), ch. 350, p. 2033, § 5, effective May 28.

L. 2019:

IP(1) and (1)(a)(II) amended, (HB 19-1038), ch. 116, p. 491, § 2, effective April 16.

L. 2022:

(1)(a)(V) and (1)(i) added and (1)(b) repealed, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2845, § 21, effective June 7.

25.5-8-108. Financial management - cash system of accounting.

The department shall propose rules for approval by the medical services board to implement financial management of the plan. Pursuant to such rules, the department shall adjust benefit levels, eligibility guidelines, and any other measure to ensure that sufficient funds are present to implement the provisions of this article. The department shall develop and use quality assurance measures, such as the health employer data information set (HEDIS) reports regarding provider compensation, adapted to children's needs, to ensure that appropriate health-care outcomes are met and to justify the continued use of taxpayer dollars for the plan. The department shall implement performance-based contracting based on such quality assurance measures.

The department shall make a quarterly assessment of the expected expenditures for the plan for the remainder of the current biennium and for the following biennium. The estimated expenditures, including minimum reserve requirements shall be compared to an estimate of the revenues that will be deposited in the trust fund. Based on this comparison, the department shall make adjustments as necessary to ensure that expenditures remain within the limits of available revenues for the remainder of the current biennium and the following biennium.

The department may, in addition to any other measure it determines to be necessary, decrease subsidies for annual enrollment fees or limit enrollment in the plan to ensure that the trust retains sufficient funds pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Nothing in this article or any rules promulgated pursuant to the plan shall be interpreted to create a legal entitlement in any person to coverage under the plan. If enrollment in the plan is limited, the department shall give priority to children with family incomes under one hundred thirty-three percent of the federal poverty line.

The department shall report quarterly to the joint budget committee on any enrollment caps that have been instituted for the plan and the number of children who are on waiting lists.

The department shall utilize the cash system of accounting, as enunciated by the governmental accounting standards board, regardless of the source of revenues involved, for all activities of the department relating to the financial administration of any nonadministrative expenditure for the plan.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1980, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(5) added, p. 465, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(4)(a) amended, p. 459, § 2, effective April 14.

L. 2010:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2115, § 152, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-19-108 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-8-109. Eligibility - children - pregnant women.

To be eligible for a subsidy, a child must not be insured by a comparable health plan through an employer.

If one child from a family is enrolled in the plan, all children must be enrolled, unless the other children have alternative health insurance coverage.

The department may establish procedures such that children with family incomes that exceed the percent of the federal poverty guidelines specified in section 25.5-8-103 (4)(a) may enroll in the plan, but are not eligible for subsidies from the department.

A child whose family income does not exceed the applicable level specified in section 25.5-8-103 (4)(a) shall be presumptively eligible for the plan. Children who are determined to be eligible for the plan shall remain eligible for twelve months subsequent to the last day of the month in which they were enrolled; except that a child shall no longer be eligible for the plan and shall be disenrolled from the plan if the department becomes aware of or is notified that any of the following has occurred:

The child has moved out of the state; or

Repealed.

The child has been enrolled in a commercial health insurance plan during the twelve-month period following enrollment in the plan under this article.

(4.5) (a) (I) To the extent authorized by federal law, the department shall require an applicant to state only the applicant's family income and shall notify the applicant that the applicant's family income will be verified by federally approved electronic data sources. The department shall allow an applicant to provide income information more recent than the records of the federally approved electronic data sources.

The department shall annually verify the recipient's income eligibility at reenrollment through federally approved electronic data sources. If a recipient meets all eligibility requirements, a recipient remains enrolled in the plan. The department shall also allow a recipient to provide income information more recent than the records of federally approved electronic data sources.

If the state department determines that a recipient was not eligible for medical benefits solely based upon the recipient's income after the recipient had been determined to be eligible based upon information verified through federally approved electronic data sources, the state department shall not pursue recovery from a county department for the cost of medical services provided to the recipient, and the county department is not responsible for any federal error rate sanctions resulting from such determination.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this paragraph (a), for applications that contain self-employment income, the state department shall not implement this paragraph (a) until it can verify self-employment income through federally approved electronic data sources as authorized by rules of the state department and federal law.

The county department, state department, or other entity designated by the state department to make the eligibility determination shall automatically transfer to the state insurance marketplace through a system interface the application data and verifications of a child or pregnant woman who is determined ineligible for medical assistance benefits pursuant to this section.

Repealed.

Subject to the provisions and requirements of section 25.5-4-205 (3)(e), the department shall establish a process so that an enrollee or the parent or guardian of an enrollee may apply for reenrollment either over the telephone or through the internet.

A pregnant woman whose family income does not exceed the applicable level specified in section 25.5-8-103 (4)(b) shall be presumptively eligible for the plan. Once determined eligible for the plan, a pregnant woman shall be considered to be continuously eligible throughout the pregnancy and for the sixty days following the pregnancy, even if the woman's eligibility would otherwise terminate during such period due to an increase in income. Upon birth, a child born to a woman eligible for the plan shall be eligible for the plan and shall be automatically enrolled in the plan in accordance with the eligibility requirements for children specified in subsection (4) of this section.
(5) (a) (I) A pregnant woman whose family income does not exceed the applicable level specified in section 25.5-8-103 (4)(b) shall be presumptively eligible for the plan. Once determined eligible for the plan, a pregnant woman shall be considered to be continuously eligible throughout the pregnancy and for the sixty days following the pregnancy, even if the woman's eligibility would otherwise terminate during such period due to an increase in income. Upon birth, a child born to a woman eligible for the plan shall be eligible for the plan and shall be automatically enrolled in the plan in accordance with the eligibility requirements for children specified in subsection (4) of this section.

Repealed.

Under the plan, prenatal and postpartum primary health-care providers shall implement policies regarding the integration of evidence-based tobacco use treatments into the regular health-care delivery system, including, but not limited to:

Assessment of tobacco use and exposure to second-hand smoke;

Education on the dangers of tobacco use during pregnancy and postpartum;

Referrals to appropriate cessation services.

Health-care providers may coordinate the implementation of such policies with the tobacco education, prevention, and cessation programs established in section 25-3.5-804, C.R.S.

The addition of coverage under the plan for pregnant women shall only be implemented if the department obtains a waiver from the federal department of health and human services.

Enrollment of a pregnant woman in the plan shall be limited based upon annual appropriations made out of the trust by the general assembly as described in section 25.5-8-105 and any grants and donations. The general assembly shall annually establish maximum enrollment figures for pregnant women in the plan. The department shall not exceed the enrollment caps regardless of whether the funding comes from annual appropriations or grants and donations.

(5.5) (a) Subject to the receipt of federal financial participation, to the maximum extent allowed under federal law, a person who was eligible for the plan while pregnant and who remains eligible for the plan for the sixty days following the pregnancy remains continuously eligible for all services under the plan for the twelve-month postpartum period.

The department shall seek any plan amendment necessary to implement a twelve-month postpartum benefit pursuant to this subsection (5.5) and shall implement the benefit only upon receipt of federal authorization and financial participation, and no later than July 1, 2022.

If permissible under federal law, an eligible individual within the postpartum period may resume coverage under the plan upon implementation of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, but subject to the receipt of federal financial participation, the department shall provide benefits pursuant to this article 8 to a pregnant person who is lawfully residing, as defined in section 25.5-4-103 (10), and a child less than nineteen years of age, who is lawfully residing, so long as such pregnant person or child meets eligibility criteria other than those related to citizenship or immigration status.

Beginning no later than January 1, 2025, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall provide benefits pursuant to this article 8 to a pregnant person who is not a citizen and is not eligible pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, so long as the pregnant person meets the eligibility criteria other than those related to citizenship or immigration status. Eligibility pursuant to this section extends continuously through the twelve-month postpartum period, so long as eligibility remains in effect pursuant to subsection (5.5)(a) of this section.

The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to maximize any available federal financial participation in implementing this subsection (7).

During its 2024 presentation to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", the state department shall report on its plans and progress in implementing the coverage expansion created pursuant to this subsection (7).

Beginning January 1, 2026, and continuing every January thereafter, the state department, in its presentation to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", shall report on the cost savings and health improvements associated with the coverage expansion created pursuant to this subsection (7).

This subsection (7) constitutes state authority within the meaning of 8 U.S.C. sec. 1621 (d), as that law existed on January 1, 2022.

Source:

L. 2006:

(5)(a) amended, p. 1121, § 1, effective May 25; entire article added with relocations, p. 1981, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(5)(a)(I) and (5)(a)(II)(A) amended, p. 151, § 12, effective March 22; (3), IP(4), and (4)(b) amended, p. 1493, § 6, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2008:

(4.5) added, p. 2026, § 2, effective June 3; (5)(a)(I) amended, p. 2020, § 5, effective October 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(4.5)(c) added, (HB 09-1020), ch. 298, p. 1596, § 2, effective May 21; (6) added, (HB 09-1353), ch. 360, p. 1870, § 3, effective July 1, 2010.

L. 2012:

(4.5)(a)(I), (4.5)(a)(II), and (4.5)(a)(III) amended, (HB 12-1120), ch. 27, p. 109, § 26, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-008), ch. 78, p. 251, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 2014:

(4)(a) and (4.5)(a) amended and (4)(b) repealed, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 114, § 8, effective February 27.

L. 2021:

(5.5) added, (SB 21-194), ch. 434, p. 2871, § 8, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(5.5)(a) and (6) amended and (7) added, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2846, § 22, effective June 7.